Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
ARTICLE 10 UNIFORM DISSOLUTION OF MARRIAGE ACT
14-10-127. Evaluation and reports - training and qualifications of evaluators - disclosure.

In all proceedings concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities with respect to a child, the court may, upon motion of either party or upon its own motion, order any county or district department of human or social services or a licensed mental health professional qualified pursuant to subsection (4) of this section and referred to in this section as an "evaluator" to perform an evaluation and file a written report concerning the disputed issues relating to the allocation of parental responsibilities for the child, unless the motion by either party is made for the purpose of delaying the proceedings. The purpose of the evaluation and report is to assist in determining the best interests of the child, with the child's safety always paramount. The evaluation and subsequent report must focus on the best interests of the child and the factors set forth in sections 14-10-124 and 14-10-129 in any post-decree or relocation case. In addition, the evaluator shall assess a party's parenting attributes as those attributes relate to the best interests of the child, and consider any psychological needs of the child when making recommendations concerning decision-making and parenting time.

Any court or any personnel of a county or district department of human or social services appointed by the court to do an evaluation pursuant to this section must be qualified pursuant to subsection (4) of this section and be selected from an eligibility roster established pursuant to applicable chief justice directive.

When a mental health professional performs the evaluation, the court shall appoint or approve the selection of the mental health professional as the evaluator. Within seven days after the appointment, the evaluator shall comply with the disclosure provisions of subsection (1.2) of this section. The court shall, at the time of the evaluator's appointment, order one or more of the parties to deposit a reasonable sum with the court to pay the cost of the evaluation. The court may order the reasonable charge for the evaluation and report to be assessed as costs between the parties at the time the evaluation is completed.

(I.3) In determining whether to order an evaluation pursuant to this section, in addition to any other considerations the court deems relevant, the court shall consider:

(A) Whether an investigation by a child and family investigator pursuant to section 14-10-116.5 would be sufficient or appropriate given the scope or nature of the disputed issues relating to the allocation of parental responsibilities for the child;

(B) Whether an evaluation pursuant to this section is necessary to assist the court in determining the best interests of the child; and

(C) Whether involving the child in an evaluation pursuant to this section is in the best interests of the child.

(I.5) A party may request a supplemental evaluation to the evaluation ordered pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section. The court shall appoint another qualified evaluator to perform the supplemental evaluation at the initial expense of the moving party. The evaluator appointed to perform the supplemental evaluation shall comply with the disclosure provisions of subsection (1.2) of this section. The court shall not order a supplemental evaluation if it determines that any of the following applies, based on motion and supporting affidavits:

(A) Such motion is interposed for purposes of delay;

(B) A party objects, and the party who objects or the child has a physical or mental condition that would make it harmful for such party or the child to participate in the supplemental evaluation;

(C) The purpose of such motion is to harass or oppress the other party;

The moving party has failed or refused to cooperate with the first evaluation;

The weight of the evidence other than the evaluation concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities or parenting time by the mental health professional demonstrates that a second evaluation would not be of benefit to the court in determining the allocation of parental responsibilities and parenting time; or

In addition to the evaluation ordered pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a), there has been an investigation and report prepared by a child and family investigator pursuant to section 14-10-116.5, and the court finds that a supplemental evaluation concerning parental responsibilities will not serve the best interests of the child.

The person signing a report or evaluation and supervising its preparation must be a licensed mental health professional. The licensed mental health professional signing a report or evaluation must be qualified as competent, by training and experience, as described in subsection (4) of this section. Unlicensed associates or other persons may work with the mental health professional to prepare the report.

An evaluator shall strive to engage in culturally informed and nondiscriminatory practices, and strive to avoid conflicts of interest or multiple relationships in conducting evaluations.

(1.2) (a) Within seven days after his or her appointment, the evaluator shall disclose to each party, attorneys of record, and the court any familial, financial, or social relationship that the evaluator has or has had with the child, either party, the attorneys of record, or the judicial officer and, if a relationship exists, the nature of the relationship.

Based on the disclosure required pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.2), the court may, in its discretion, terminate the appointment and appoint a different evaluator in the proceedings. A party has seven days from the date of the disclosure to object to the appointment based upon information contained in the disclosure. If a party objects to the appointment, the court shall appoint a different person or confirm the appointment within seven days after the date of the party's objection. If no party timely objects to the appointment, then the appointment is deemed confirmed.

In preparing the report concerning a child, the evaluator may consult any person who may have information about the child and the child's potential parenting arrangements. Upon order of the court, the evaluator may refer the child to other professional personnel for diagnosis. The evaluator may consult with and obtain information from medical, mental health, educational, or other expert persons who have served the child in the past without obtaining the consent of the parent or the person allocated parental responsibilities for the child; but the child's consent must be obtained if the child has reached the age of fifteen years unless the court finds that the child lacks mental capacity to consent. If the requirements of subsections (3) to (7) of this section are fulfilled, the evaluator's report may be received in evidence at the hearing.

The evaluator shall mail the report to the court and to counsel and to any party not represented by counsel at least twenty-one days prior to the hearing. The evaluator shall make available to counsel and to any party not represented by counsel his or her file of underlying data and reports, complete texts of diagnostic reports made to the evaluator pursuant to the provisions of subsections (2), (5), and (6) of this section, and the names and addresses of all persons whom the evaluator has consulted. Any party to the proceeding may call the evaluator and any person with whom the evaluator has consulted for cross-examination. No party may waive his or her right of cross-examination prior to the hearing.

A person is not allowed to testify as an expert witness regarding a parental responsibilities or parenting time evaluation that the person has performed pursuant to this section unless the court finds that the person is qualified as competent, by training and experience, in the areas of:

The effects of divorce and remarriage on children, adults, and families;

The effects of domestic violence on children, adults, and families, including the connection between domestic violence and trauma on children, child abuse, and child sexual abuse. The person's training and experience must be provided by recognized sources with expertise in domestic violence and the traumatic effects of domestic violence. As of January 1, 2022, initial and ongoing training must include, at a minimum:

Six initial hours of training on domestic violence, including coercive control, and its traumatic effects on children, adults, and families;

Six initial hours of training on child abuse and child sexual abuse and its traumatic effects; and

Four subsequent hours of training every two years on domestic violence, child abuse, and child sexual abuse and the traumatic effects on children, adults, and families.

Appropriate parenting techniques;

Child development, including cognitive, personality, emotional, and psychological development;

Child and adult psychopathology;

Applicable clinical assessment techniques; and

Applicable legal and ethical requirements of parental responsibilities evaluation.

If an evaluation is indicated in an area beyond the training or experience of the evaluator, the evaluator shall consult with a mental health professional qualified by training or experience, as described in subsection (4) of this section, in that area. Such areas may include, but are not limited to, domestic violence, child abuse, child sexual abuse, alcohol or substance abuse, or psychological testing.

An evaluator may make specific reports when the evaluator has interviewed and assessed all parties to the dispute, assessed the quality of the relationship, or the potential for establishing a quality relationship, between the child and each of the parties, and had access to pertinent information from outside sources.

An evaluator may make reports even though all parties and the child have not been evaluated by the same evaluator in the following circumstances, if the evaluator states with particularity the limitations of the evaluator's findings and reports:

Any of the parties reside outside Colorado and it would not be feasible for all parties and the child to be evaluated by the same mental health professional; or

One party refuses or is unable to cooperate with the court-ordered evaluation; or

The mental health professional is a member of a team of professionals that performed the evaluation and is presenting recommendations of the team that has interviewed and assessed all parties to the dispute.

Recommendations should be considered in full context of the report.

A written report of the evaluation shall be provided to the court and to the parties pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

The report of the evaluation shall include, but need not be limited to, the following information:

A description of the procedures employed during the evaluation;

A report of the data collected;

A conclusion that explains how the resulting recommendations were reached from the data collected, with specific reference to criteria listed in section 14-10-124 (1.5), and, if applicable, to the criteria listed in section 14-10-131, and their relationship to the results of the evaluation;

Recommendations concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities for the child, including decision-making responsibility, parenting time, and other considerations; and

An explanation of any limitations in the evaluations or any reservations regarding the resulting recommendations.

All evaluations and reports, including but not limited to supplemental evaluations and related medical and mental health information, that are submitted to the court pursuant to this section shall be deemed confidential without the necessity of filing a motion to seal or otherwise limit access to the court file under the Colorado rules of civil procedure. An evaluation or report that is deemed confidential under this subsection (8) shall not be made available for public inspection without an order of the court authorizing public inspection.

On and after January 1, 2022, a party wishing to file a complaint related to a person's duties as an evaluator shall file such complaint in accordance with the applicable provisions in chief justice directives.

The requirements of this section apply only to activities related to work performed that is related to proceedings concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities. All other licensure requirements for mental health professionals, as established by the department of regulatory agencies and set forth in article 245 of title 12, still apply.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 530, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-27.

L. 76:

(1) amended, p. 529, § 1, effective April 16.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 646, § 1, effective March 2.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 649, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 88:

Entire section amended, p. 639, § 1, effective May 11.

L. 93:

IP(1)(a)(I), IP(4), and (7)(b)(IV) amended, p. 577, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1)(a)(II) amended, p. 2645, § 108, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1287, § 1, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 98:

IP(1)(a)(I), (2), (3), (4), (6)(b), and (7) amended, p. 1384, § 13, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2005:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1224, § 1, effective June 3; (1)(a)(I.5)(F) amended, p. 963, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(8) added, p. 447, § 1, effective April 13.

L. 2012:

(1)(a)(I) and IP(1)(a)(I.5) amended and (1.2) added, (SB 12-056), ch. 108, p. 368, § 3, effective July 1; (3) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 832, § 30, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1)(a)(I) amended and (1)(a)(I.3) added, (HB 13-1259), ch. 218, p. 1000, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(1)(a)(II) amended, (SB 15-099), ch. 99, p. 289, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2018:

(1)(a)(I) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 401, § 15, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(1)(a)(I), IP(1)(a)(I.5), (1)(a)(II), (1)(b), IP(4), (5), (6)(a), and IP(6)(b) amended and (1)(c), (4)(a.5), (6)(c), (9), and (10) added (HB 21-1228), ch. 292, p. 1732, § 6, effective June 22.

Cross references:

(1) For the licensing of mental health professionals, see article 245 of title 12.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending the introductory portions to subsections (1)(a)(I) and (4) and subsection (7)(b)(IV), see section 1 of chapter 165, Session Laws of Colorado 1993. For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsection (1)(a)(II), see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994. For the legislative declarations contained in the 2005 act amending subsection (1)(a)(I.5)(F), see sections 1 and 3 of chapter 244, Session Laws of Colorado 2005. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018. For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1228, see section 1 of chapter 292, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

14-10-128. Hearings.

Proceedings concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities with respect to a child shall receive priority in being set for hearing.

The court may tax as costs the payment of necessary travel and other expenses incurred by any person whose presence at the hearing the court deems necessary to determine the best interests of the child.

The court without a jury shall determine questions of law and fact. If it finds that a public hearing may be detrimental to the child's best interests, the court may exclude the public from a hearing concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities but may admit any person who has a direct and legitimate interest in the particular case or a legitimate educational or research interest in the work of the court.

If the court finds it necessary in order to protect the child's welfare that the record of any interview, report, investigation, or testimony in a proceeding concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities be kept secret, the court shall make an appropriate order sealing the record.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 531, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-28.

L. 98:

(1), (3), and (4) amended, p. 1386, § 14, effective February 1, 1999.

14-10-128.1. Appointment of parenting coordinator - disclosure.

Pursuant to the provisions of this section, at any time after the entry of an order concerning parental responsibilities and upon notice to the parties, the court may, on its own motion, a motion by either party, or an agreement of the parties, appoint a parenting coordinator as a neutral third party to assist in the resolution of disputes between the parties concerning parental responsibilities, including but not limited to implementation of the court-ordered parenting plan. The parenting coordinator shall be a neutral person with appropriate training and qualifications and an independent perspective acceptable to the court. Within seven days after the appointment, the appointed person shall comply with the disclosure provisions of subsection (2.5) of this section.

Absent agreement of the parties, a court shall not appoint a parenting coordinator unless the court makes the following findings:

That the parties have failed to adequately implement the parenting plan;

That mediation has been determined by the court to be inappropriate, or, if not inappropriate, that mediation has been attempted and was unsuccessful; and

That the appointment of a parenting coordinator is in the best interests of the child or children involved in the parenting plan.

In addition to making the findings required pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), prior to appointing a parenting coordinator, the court may consider the effect of any claim or documented evidence of domestic violence, as defined in section 14-10-124 (1.3)(a), by the other party on the parties' ability to engage in parent coordination.

(2.5) (a) Within seven days after his or her appointment, the appointed person shall disclose to each party, attorneys of record, and the court any familial, financial, or social relationship that the appointed person has or has had with the child, either party, the attorneys of record, or the judicial officer and, if a relationship exists, the nature of the relationship.

Based on the disclosure required pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.5), the court may, in its discretion, terminate the appointment and appoint a different person in the proceedings. A party has seven days from the date of the disclosure to object to the appointment based upon information contained in the disclosure. If a party objects to the appointment, the court shall appoint a different person or confirm the appointment within seven days after the date of the party's objection. If no party timely objects to the appointment, then the appointment is deemed confirmed.

A parenting coordinator shall assist the parties in implementing the terms of the parenting plan. Duties of a parenting coordinator include, but are not limited to, the following:

Assisting the parties in creating an agreed-upon, structured guideline for implementation of the parenting plan;

Developing guidelines for communication between the parties and suggesting appropriate resources to assist the parties in learning appropriate communication skills;

Informing the parties about appropriate resources to assist them in developing improved parenting skills;

Assisting the parties in realistically identifying the sources and causes of conflict between them, including but not limited to identifying each party's contribution to the conflict, when appropriate; and

Assisting the parties in developing parenting strategies to minimize conflict.

The court may not appoint a person pursuant to this section to serve in a case as a parenting coordinator if the person has served or is serving in the same case as an evaluator pursuant to section 14-10-127 or a representative of the child pursuant to section 14-10-116. After appointing a person pursuant to this section to serve as a parenting coordinator in a case, the court may not subsequently appoint the person to serve in the same case as an evaluator pursuant to section 14-10-127 or a representative of the child pursuant to section 14-10-116.

The court may appoint a person who has served or is serving in a case as a child and family investigator pursuant to section 14-10-116.5 to serve in the same case as the parenting coordinator, upon the agreement of the parties. After appointing a person pursuant to this section to serve as a parenting coordinator in a case, the court may not subsequently appoint the person to serve as a child and family investigator in the same case pursuant to section 14-10-116.5.

A court order appointing a parenting coordinator shall be for a specified term; except that the court order shall not appoint a parenting coordinator for a period of longer than two years. If an order fails to specify the length of the court-ordered appointment, it shall be construed to be two years from the date of appointment. Upon agreement of the parties, the court may extend, modify, or terminate the appointment, including extending the appointment beyond two years from the date of the original appointment. The court may terminate the appointment of the parenting coordinator at any time for good cause. The court shall allow the parenting coordinator to withdraw at any time.

A court order appointing a parenting coordinator shall include apportionment of the responsibility for payment of all of the parenting coordinator's fees between the parties. The state shall not be responsible for payment of fees to a parenting coordinator appointed pursuant to this section.

A parenting coordinator appointed by the court pursuant to this section shall be immune from civil liability in any claim for injury that arises out of an act or omission of the parenting coordinator occurring on or after April 16, 2009, during the performance of his or her duties or during the performance of any act that a reasonable parenting coordinator would believe was within the scope of his or her duties unless the act or omission causing the injury was willful and wanton.

Nothing in this subsection (7) shall be construed to bar a party from asserting a claim:

Based upon a parenting coordinator's failure to comply with the provision set forth in subsection (8) of this section;

Related to the reasonableness or accuracy of any fee charged or time billed by a parenting coordinator; or

Based upon a negligent act or omission involving the operation of a motor vehicle by a parenting coordinator.

In a judicial proceeding, administrative proceeding, or other similar proceeding between the parties to the action, a parenting coordinator shall not be competent to testify and may not be required to produce records as to any statement, conduct, or decision that occurred during the parenting coordinator's appointment to the same extent as a judge of a court of this state acting in a judicial capacity.

This paragraph (c) shall not apply:

To the extent testimony or production of records by the parenting coordinator is necessary to determine a claim of the parenting coordinator against a party; or

To the extent testimony or production of records by the parenting coordinator is necessary to determine a claim of a party against a parenting coordinator; or

When both parties have agreed, in writing, to authorize the parenting coordinator to testify.

If a person commences a civil action against a parenting coordinator arising from the services of the parenting coordinator, or if a person seeks to compel a parenting coordinator to testify or produce records in violation of paragraph (c) of this subsection (7), and the court determines that the parenting coordinator is immune from civil liability or that the parenting coordinator is not competent to testify, the court shall award to the parenting coordinator reasonable attorney fees and reasonable expenses of litigation.

The parenting coordinator shall comply with any applicable provisions set forth in chief justice directives and any other practice or ethical standards established by rule, statute, guideline, or licensing board that regulates the parenting coordinator.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 952, § 1, effective June 2; (4)(b) amended, p. 963, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(7) and (8) amended, (SB 09-069), ch. 121, p. 502, § 1, effective April 16.

L. 2012:

(1) and (2)(b) amended and (2.5) added, (SB 12-056), ch. 108, p. 369, § 4, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declarations contained in the 2005 act amending subsection (4)(b), see sections 1 and 3 of chapter 244, Session Laws of Colorado 2005.

14-10-128.3. Appointment of decision-maker - disclosure.

In addition to the appointment of a parenting coordinator pursuant to section 14-10-128.1 or an arbitrator pursuant to section 14-10-128.5, at any time after the entry of an order concerning parental responsibilities and upon written consent of both parties, the court may appoint a qualified domestic relations decision-maker and grant to the decision-maker binding authority to resolve disputes between the parties as to implementation or clarification of existing orders concerning the parties' minor or dependent children, including but not limited to disputes concerning parenting time, specific disputed parental decisions, and child support. A decision-maker shall have the authority to make binding determinations to implement or clarify the provisions of a pre-existing court order in a manner that is consistent with the substantive intent of the court order. The decision-maker appointed pursuant to the provisions of this section may be the same person as the parenting coordinator appointed pursuant to section 14-10-128.1. At the time of the appointment, the appointed person shall comply with the disclosure provisions of subsection (4.5) of this section.

The decision-maker's procedures for making determinations shall be in writing and shall be approved by the parties prior to the time the decision-maker begins to resolve a dispute of the parties. If a party is unable or unwilling to agree to the decision-maker's procedures, the decision-maker shall be allowed to withdraw from the matter.

All decisions made by the decision-maker pursuant to this section shall be in writing, dated, and signed by the decision-maker. Decisions of the decision-maker shall be filed with the court and mailed to the parties or to counsel for the parties, if any, no later than twenty days after the date the decision is issued. All decisions shall be effective immediately upon issuance and shall continue in effect until vacated, corrected, or modified by the decision-maker or until an order is entered by a court pursuant to a de novo hearing under subsection (4) of this section.

A party may file a motion with the court requesting that a decision of the decision-maker be modified by the court pursuant to a de novo hearing. A motion for a de novo hearing shall be filed no later than thirty-five days after the date the decision is issued pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

If a court, in its discretion based on the pleadings filed, grants a party's request for a de novo hearing to modify the decision of the decision-maker and the court substantially upholds the decision of the decision-maker, the party that requested the de novo hearing shall pay the fees and costs of the other party and shall pay the fees and costs incurred by the decision-maker in connection with the request for de novo hearing, unless the court finds that it would be manifestly unjust.

(4.5) (a) Within seven days after his or her appointment, the appointed person shall disclose to each party, attorneys of record, and the court any familial, financial, or social relationship that the appointed person has or has had with the child, either party, the attorneys of record, or the judicial officer and, if a relationship exists, the nature of the relationship.

Based on the disclosure required pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (4.5), the court may, in its discretion, terminate the appointment and appoint a different person in the proceedings. A party has seven days from the date of the disclosure to object to the appointment based upon information contained in the disclosure. If a party objects to the appointment, the court shall appoint a different person or confirm the appointment within seven days after the date of the party's objection. If no party timely objects to the appointment, then the appointment is deemed confirmed.

A court order appointing a decision-maker shall be for a specified term; except that the court order shall not appoint a decision-maker for a period of longer than two years. If an order fails to specify the length of the court-ordered appointment, it shall be construed to be two years from the date of appointment. Upon agreement of the parties, the court may extend, modify, or terminate the appointment, including extending the appointment beyond two years from the date of the original appointment. The court may terminate the appointment of the decision-maker at any time for good cause. The court shall allow the decision-maker to withdraw at any time.

A court order appointing a decision-maker shall include apportionment of the responsibility for payment of all of the decision-maker's fees between the parties. The state shall not be responsible for payment of fees to a decision-maker appointed pursuant to this section.

A decision-maker shall be immune from liability in any claim for injury that arises out of an act or omission of the decision-maker occurring during the performance of his or her duties or during the performance of an act that the decision-maker reasonably believed was within the scope of his or her duties unless the act or omission causing such injury was willful and wanton.

Nothing in this subsection (7) shall be construed to bar a party from asserting a claim related to the reasonableness or accuracy of any fee charged or time billed by a decision-maker.

In a judicial proceeding, administrative proceeding, or other similar proceeding, a decision-maker shall not be competent to testify and may not be required to produce records as to any statement, conduct, or decision, that occurred during the decision-maker's appointment, to the same extent as a judge of a court of this state acting in a judicial capacity.

This paragraph (c) shall not apply:

To the extent testimony or production of records by the decision-maker is necessary to determine the claim of the decision-maker against a party; or

To the extent testimony or production of records by the decision-maker is necessary to determine a claim of a party against a decision-maker; or

When both parties have agreed, in writing, to authorize the decision-maker to testify.

If a person commences a civil action against a decision-maker arising from the services of the decision-maker, or if a person seeks to compel a decision-maker to testify or produce records in violation of paragraph (c) of this subsection (7), and the court decides that the decision-maker is immune from civil liability or that the decision-maker is not competent to testify, the court shall award to the decision-maker reasonable attorney fees and reasonable expenses of litigation.

The decision-maker shall comply with any applicable provisions set forth in chief justice directives and any other practice or ethical standards established by rule, statute, or licensing board that regulates the decision-maker.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 954, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 2012:

(1) amended and (4.5) added, (SB 12-056), ch. 108, p. 370, § 5, effective July 1; (4)(a) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 832, § 31, effective July 1.

14-10-128.5. Appointment of arbitrator - de novo hearing of award.

With the consent of all parties, the court may appoint an arbitrator to resolve disputes between the parties concerning the parties' minor or dependent children, including but not limited to parenting time, nonrecurring adjustments to child support, and disputed parental decisions. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, all awards entered by an arbitrator appointed pursuant to this section shall be in writing. The arbitrator's award shall be effective immediately upon entry and shall continue in effect until vacated by the arbitrator pursuant to part 2 of article 22 of title 13, C.R.S., modified or corrected by the arbitrator pursuant to part 2 of article 22 of title 13, C.R.S., or modified by the court pursuant to a de novo hearing under subsection (2) of this section.

Any party may apply to have the arbitrator's award vacated, modified, or corrected pursuant to part 2 of article 22 of title 13, C.R.S., or may move the court to modify the arbitrator's award pursuant to a de novo hearing concerning such award by filing a motion for hearing no later than thirty-five days after the date of the award. In circumstances in which a party moves for a de novo hearing by the court, if the court, in its discretion based on the pleadings filed, grants the motion and the court substantially upholds the decision of the arbitrator, the party that requested the de novo hearing shall be ordered to pay the fees and costs of the other party and the fees of the arbitrator incurred in responding to the application or motion unless the court finds that it would be manifestly unjust.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 33, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1731, § 3, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 956, § 2, effective June 2.

L. 2012:

(2) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 833, § 32, effective July 1.